Tables/Contraction/zh_TW.ctb
#Unicode symbols
always \u00EF 4-24
always \u00A0 0
always \u00A1 34-2346
always \u00A2 4-14
always \u00A3 4-123
always \u00A4 456-1246
always \u00A5 36-134567-157-13457-36
always \u00A7 1246-256
always \u00A8 456-36
always \u00A9 12356-147-23456
always \u00AA 36-1247-157-1347-36
always \u00AB 126-126
always \u00AC 36-13457-1357-23457-36
always \u00AD 36
always \u00AE 12356-12357-23456
always \u00AF 156-36
always \u00B0 45-46-16
always \u00B1 346-36
always \u00B2 457-23
always \u00B3 457-25
always \u00B4 4
always \u00B5 46-134
always \u00B6 1246-1234
always \u00B7 46
always \u00B8 2346-4
always \u00B9 457-2
always \u00BA 36-1347-17-2347-36
always \u00BB 345-345
always \u00BC 2-34-256
always \u00BD 2-34-23
always \u00BE 25-34-256
always \u00BF 34-1456
always \u00C0 456-17
always \u00C1 457-17
always \u00C2 346-17
always \u00C3 45-17
always \u00C4 36-17
always \u00C5 4-6-1
always \u00C6 17-157
always \u00D7 4-16
always \u00F7 46-34
always \u0251 46-1
always \u02C7 34567-4
always \u02C9 34567-3
always \u02CA 34567-2
always \u02CB 34567-5
always \u02D9 34567-17
always \u0391 46-17
always \u0392 46-127
always \u0393 46-12457
always \u0394 46-1457
always \u0395 46-157
always \u0396 46-13567
always \u0397 46-1567
always \u0398 46-14567
always \u0399 46-247
always \u039A 46-137
always \u039B 46-1237
always \u039C 46-1347
always \u039D 46-13457
always \u039E 46-13467
always \u039F 46-1357
always \u03A0 46-12347
always \u03A1 46-12357
always \u03A3 46-2347
always \u03A4 46-23457
always \u03A5 46-1367
always \u03A6 46-1247
always \u03A7 46-123467
always \u03A8 46-134567
always \u03A9 46-24567
always \u03B1 46-1
always \u03B2 46-12
always \u03B3 46-1245
always \u03B4 46-145
always \u03B5 46-15
always \u03B6 46-1356
always \u03B7 46-156
always \u03B8 46-1456
always \u03B9 46-24
always \u03BA 46-13
always \u03BB 46-123
always \u03BC 46-134
always \u03BD 46-1345
always \u03BE 46-1346
always \u03BF 46-135
always \u03C0 46-1234
always \u03C1 46-1235
always \u03C3 46-234
always \u03C4 46-2345
always \u03C5 46-136
always \u03C6 46-124
always \u03C7 46-12346
always \u03C8 46-13456
always \u03C9 46-2456
always \u200E 36-345
always \u200F 126-36
always \u2010 36
always \u2011 5-2
always \u2012 36
always \u2013 36
always \u2014 5-2
always \u2015 36-36
always \u2016 1246-123
always \u2017 456-456
always \u2018 4
always \u2019 3
always \u201C 236-236
always \u201D 356-356
always \u2020 346
always \u2021 123456-123456-345
always \u2022 36
always \u2024 34567-1
always \u2025 46-46
always \u2026 5-5-5
always \u2027 36
always \u2028 1256
always \u202F 0
always \u2030 4-356-356
always \u2032 3
always \u2033 4-3456
always \u2034 3-3-3
always \u2035 3
always \u2038 457
always \u203B 46-16
always \u203C 2346-2346
always \u203D 1456-2346
always \u203E 23467-578
always \u2041 457
always \u2042 16-16-16
always \u2043 36
always \u2044 34
always \u2047 5
always \u2048 1456-2346
always \u2049 2346-1456
always \u204E 16
always \u2051 16-16
always \u2052 36
always \u2053 36
always \u2056 46-46-46
always \u2057 3-3-3-3
always \u2058 46-46-46-46
always \u2059 46-46-46-46-46
always \u205A 46-46
always \u205B 46-46-46-46
always \u205F 0
always \u2070 457-356
always \u2071 457-24
always \u2074 457-256
always \u2075 457-26
always \u2076 457-235
always \u2077 457-2356
always \u2078 457-236
always \u2079 457-35
always \u207A 457-346
always \u207B 457-36
always \u207C 457-123456
always \u207D 457-12356
always \u207E 457-23456
always \u207F 457-1345
always \u2080 56-356
always \u2081 56-2
always \u2082 56-23
always \u2083 56-25
always \u2084 56-256
always \u2085 56-26
always \u2086 56-235
always \u2087 56-2356
always \u2088 56-236
always \u2089 56-35
always \u208A 56-346
always \u208B 56-36
always \u208C 56-123456
always \u208D 56-12356
always \u208E 56-23456
always \u2090 56-1
always \u2091 56-15
always \u2092 56-135
always \u2093 56-1346
always \u20A0 4-15
always \u20A1 156
always \u20AC 4-15
always \u20B9 4-1235
always \u2103 45-46-16-0-147
always \u2109 45-46-16-0-1247
always \u2122 12356-23457-1347-23456
always \u2160 247
always \u2161 247-247
always \u2162 247-247-247
always \u2163 247-12367
always \u2164 12367
always \u2165 12367-247
always \u2166 12367-247-247
always \u2167 12367-247-247-247
always \u2168 247-13467
always \u2169 13467
always \u216A 13467-247
always \u216B 13467-247-247
always \u216C 13467-12367
always \u2170 24
always \u2171 24-24
always \u2172 24-24-24
always \u2173 24-1236
always \u2174 1236
always \u2175 1236-24
always \u2176 1236-24-24
always \u2177 1236-24-24-24
always \u2178 24-1346
always \u2179 1346
always \u217A 1346-24
always \u217B 1346-24-24
always \u217C 1346-1236
always \u2190 1246-246-25-25
always \u2191 1246-126-25-25-135
always \u2192 1246-25-25-135
always \u2193 1246-146-25-25-135
always \u2194 1246-246-25-25-135
always \u2195 1246-126-246-25-25-135
always \u2196 23467-348
always \u2197 23467-3568
always \u2198 23467-268
always \u2199 23467-1568
always \u21D2 123456-345
always \u21B8 235678-2456
always \u21B9 235678-1346
always \u21E7 235678-1236
always \u21E8 1246-25-25-135
always \u2200 4-12346
always \u2201 14-135-134-1234-123
always \u2202 4-145
always \u2203 4-123456
always \u2204 2345-1345-15
always \u2205 456-356
always \u2206 24-1345-13
always \u2207 46-1246
always \u2208 4-15
always \u2209 34-4-15
always \u220A 234-15-123-134
always \u220B 4-26
always \u220C 34-4-26
always \u220D 234-134-15-134
always \u220e 15-135-1234
always \u220F 46-12347
always \u2211 46-2347
always \u2212 36
always \u2213 36-5-346
always \u2215 34
always \u2216 12467-127
always \u2217 16
always \u2218 45-46-16
always \u221A 345-12456
always \u221B 126-25-345-12456
always \u221C 126-256-345-12456
always \u221D 456-123456
always \u221E 6-123456
always \u221F 1246-246-46-1235-12456
always \u2220 1246-246
always \u2223 1256
always \u2224 34-46-16
always \u2225 1246-123
always \u2226 34-1246-123
always \u2227 4-146
always \u2228 4-346
always \u2229 46-146
always \u222A 46-346
always \u222B 23467-2368
always \u222E 2346-4-1246-14-12456
always \u2234 6-16
always \u2235 4-34
always \u2236 5-2
always \u2237 1234-1235-135-1234
always \u2238 46-36
always \u223C 4-156-4-156
always \u2242 156-4-156
always \u2243 4-156-156
always \u2244 34-4-156-156
always \u2245 4-156-46-13
always \u2248 4-156-4-156
always \u2249 34-4-156-4-156
always \u224C 4-156-123456
always \u224D 1246-3-1246-1
always \u2250 5-46-13-126-16-12456
always \u2251 5-46-13-126-16-126-16-12456
always \u2252 5-46-13-126-16-126-16-12456
always \u2253 5-46-13-126-16-126-16-12456
always \u225C 5-46-13-126-1246-2345-12456
always \u2260 2346-123456
always \u2261 456-123
always \u2263 4-156-46-13
always \u2264 126-123456
always \u2265 345-123456
always \u2266 126-123456
always \u2267 345-123456
always \u226A 5-13-4-5-13-12456
always \u226B 46-2-4-46-2-12456
always \u226D 2346-123456
always \u226E 34-5-13
always \u226F 34-46-2
always \u2270 34-5-13-156
always \u2271 34-46-2-156
always \u2272 5-13-4-156
always \u2273 46-2-4-156
always \u2274 34-5-13-4-156
always \u2275 34-46-2-4-156
always \u2276 126-345
always \u2277 345-126
always \u2282 456-5-13
always \u2283 456-46-2
always \u2284 34-456-5-13
always \u2285 34-456-46-2
always \u2286 456-5-13-156
always \u2287 456-46-2-156
always \u2288 34-456-5-13-156
always \u2289 34-456-46-2-156
always \u2295 1246-14-456-1246-346-12456
always \u2296 1246-14-456-1246-36-12456
always \u2297 1246-14-456-1246-4-16-12456
always \u2298 1246-14-456-1246-456-34-12456
always \u2299 1246-14-456-1246-16-12456
always \u22A5 1246-1234
always \u22BF 1246-2345
always \u22DC 123456-126
always \u22DD 123456-345
always \u22EF 5-5-5
always \u2307 45
always \u2460 246-2-135
always \u2461 246-23-135
always \u2462 246-25-135
always \u2463 246-256-135
always \u2464 246-26-135
always \u2465 246-235-135
always \u2466 246-2356-135
always \u2467 246-236-135
always \u2468 246-35-135
always \u2469 246-2-356-135
always \u246A 246-2-2-135
always \u246B 246-2-23-135
always \u246C 246-2-25-135
always \u246D 246-2-256-135
always \u246E 246-2-26-135
always \u246F 246-2-235-135
always \u2470 246-2-2356-135
always \u2471 246-2-236-135
always \u2472 246-2-35-135
always \u2473 246-2-356-135
always \u2474 12356-2-23456
always \u2475 12356-23-23456
always \u2476 12356-25-23456
always \u2477 12356-256-23456
always \u2478 12356-26-23456
always \u2479 12356-235-23456
always \u247A 12356-2356-23456
always \u247B 12356-236-23456
always \u247C 12356-35-23456
always \u247D 12356-2-356-23456
always \u247E 12356-2-2-23456
always \u247F 12356-2-23-23456
always \u2480 12356-2-25-23456
always \u2481 12356-2-256-23456
always \u2482 12356-2-26-23456
always \u2483 12356-2-235-23456
always \u2484 12356-2-2356-23456
always \u2485 12356-2-236-23456
always \u2486 12356-2-35-23456
always \u2487 12356-23-356-23456
always \u2488 2
always \u2489 23
always \u248A 25
always \u248B 256
always \u248C 26
always \u248D 235
always \u248E 2356
always \u248F 236
always \u2490 35
always \u2491 2-356
always \u2492 2-2
always \u2493 2-23
always \u2494 2-25
always \u2495 2-256
always \u2496 2-26
always \u2497 2-235
always \u2498 2-2356
always \u2499 2-236
always \u249A 2-35
always \u249B 23-356
always \u249C 12356-1-23456
always \u249D 12356-12-23456
always \u249E 12356-14-23456
always \u249F 12356-145-23456
always \u24A0 12356-15-23456
always \u24A1 12356-124-23456
always \u24A2 12356-1245-23456
always \u24A3 12356-125-23456
always \u24A4 12356-24-23456
always \u24A5 12356-245-23456
always \u24A6 12356-13-23456
always \u24A7 12356-123-23456
always \u24A8 12356-134-23456
always \u24A9 12356-1345-23456
always \u24AA 12356-135-23456
always \u24AB 12356-1234-23456
always \u24AC 12356-12345-23456
always \u24AD 12356-1235-23456
always \u24AE 12356-234-23456
always \u24AF 12356-2345-23456
always \u24B0 12356-136-23456
always \u24B1 12356-1236-23456
always \u24B2 12356-2456-23456
always \u24B3 12356-1346-23456
always \u24B4 12356-13456-23456
always \u24B5 12356-1356-23456
always \u24B6 246-17-135
always \u24B7 246-127-135
always \u24B8 246-147-135
always \u24B9 246-1457-135
always \u24BA 246-157-135
always \u24BB 246-1247-135
always \u24BC 246-12457-135
always \u24BD 246-1257-135
always \u24BE 246-247-135
always \u24BF 246-2457-135
always \u24C0 246-137-135
always \u24C1 246-1237-135
always \u24C2 246-1347-135
always \u24C3 246-13457-135
always \u24C4 246-1357-135
always \u24C5 246-12347-135
always \u24C6 246-123457-135
always \u24C7 246-12357-135
always \u24C8 246-2347-135
always \u24C9 246-23457-135
always \u24CA 246-1367-135
always \u24CB 246-12367-135
always \u24CC 246-24567-135
always \u24CD 246-13467-135
always \u24CE 246-134567-135
always \u24CF 246-13567-135
always \u24D0 246-1-135
always \u24D1 246-12-135
always \u24D2 246-14-135
always \u24D3 246-145-135
always \u24D4 246-15-135
always \u24D5 246-124-135
always \u24D6 246-1245-135
always \u24D7 246-125-135
always \u24D8 246-24-135
always \u24D9 246-245-135
always \u24DA 246-13-135
always \u24DB 246-123-135
always \u24DC 246-134-135
always \u24DD 246-1345-135
always \u24DE 246-135-135
always \u24DF 246-1234-135
always \u24E0 246-12345-135
always \u24E1 246-1235-135
always \u24E2 246-234-135
always \u24E3 246-2345-135
always \u24E4 246-136-135
always \u24E5 246-1236-135
always \u24E6 246-2456-135
always \u24E7 246-1346-135
always \u24E8 246-13456-135
always \u24E9 246-1356-135
always \u24EA 246-356-135
always \u2500 36-36
always \u2574 1256
always \u2584 3678-3678
always \u25a0 12345678-12345678
always \u25A1 123478-145678
always \u25AA 123456-123456
always \u25B2 1246-2345
always \u25B3 1246-2345
always \u25B6 58-3
always \u25B7 58-3
always \u25BC 1246-2345
always \u25BD 1246-2345
always \u25C6 1246-145
always \u25C7 1246-145
always \u25CB 246-135
always \u25CE 246-246-135-135
always \u25CF 234568-123567
always \u25E6 46
always \u25FE 123456-123456
always \u2605 16
always \u2606 16
always \u2713 12378-67
always \u2714 2467-1346-124567
always \u276F 345
always \u2794 36-36-345
always \u2E1F 5-4-156-146-16-12456
always \u2F08 1245-136-2
